District of Columbia statutes.
29-701.11

Business transactions of partner with partnership.

A partner may lend money to and do other business with the limited partnership and has the same rights and obligations with respect to the loan or other transaction as a person that is not a partner.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(2)(F), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 29-701.09 as § 29-701.11.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 112 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Section 2(g)(2)(F) of D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 20-701.11 as § 29-701.13.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.